Missouri, session 2026, SB972.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 389, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 389.611, to read as
follows:
389.611. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Advanced detection and monitoring system", any
system capable of detecting and classifying objects such as
pedestrians, vehicles, and wildlife at railroad crossings,
using technologies such as light detection and ranging
sensors, high-resolution cameras, and artificial
intelligence;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of
transportation;
(3) "Hazard assessment", the process of analyzing
detected objects to determine whether a safety risk exists
based on predefined criteria;
(4) "Real-time alerts", automated notifications
generated to warn train crews, operations centers, or other
stakeholders of safety hazards.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of section 389.610 to
the contrary, any at grade railroad crossing constructed on

SB 972 2
or after August 28, 2026, shall include advanced detection
and monitoring systems capable of:
(1) Detecting and classifying objects along the
crossing and its approaches;
(2) Analyzing object behavior in real time to identify
safety risks;
(3) Generating real-time alerts to warn train crews,
operations personnel, and other relevant parties of
potential hazards; and
(4) Providing integration capability with existing and
future rail operation protocols, including positive train
control (PTC) systems.
3. The state highways and transportation commission,
in consultation with rail operators and safety experts,
shall:
(1) Develop standards and specifications for the
deployment of advanced detection and monitoring systems at
railroad crossings;
(2) Identify priority crossings for immediate upgrades
based on hazard assessments and traffic volume; and
(3) Provide technical assistance to rail operators in
implementing advanced detection and monitoring systems.
4. The department shall develop a program for the
provision of grant funds and public-private partnerships for
the installation of advanced detection and monitoring
systems, with preference given to the priority crossings as
determined pursuant to subsection 3 of this section. The
department may promulgate rules to implement such program.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of

SB 972 3
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
5. Rail operators shall annually submit a report to
the department detailing the performance of advanced
detection and monitoring systems installed at railroad
crossings in this state, including data on hazard detection,
real-time alerts issued, and incidents prevented. The
department shall biennially submit a report to the general
assembly evaluating the effectiveness of such systems and
providing recommendations for any changes to state law
relating to such systems.
✓